Arkansas, session 2025, HB1207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-6-218(a)—(c), concerning survivors'
benefits for the surviving spouse and children of an officer killed in the
line of duty while not a member of the State Police Retirement System, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) In the event any uniformed employee of the Division of Arkansas
State Police state police officer is killed while in the performance of his
or her duties, yet the surviving spouse and surviving children of the
uniformed employee of the division state police officer are deprived of
receiving benefits as prescribed in § 24-6-217 because the uniformed employee
state police officer was not a member of the system State Police Retirement
System at the time of his or her death, or had not completed any probationary
period of service required by rules of the Arkansas State Police Commission,
or had not obtained sufficient service for benefits, the surviving spouse may
make application to the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement
*LJH050*
01/23/2025 9:53:22 AM LJH050

HB1207
System.
(2) Upon establishing proof of the facts set forth in this
subsection, the surviving spouse and surviving children shall be eligible for
and receive survivors' benefits for himself or herself and the unmarried
children of the deceased uniformed employee state police officer who was
killed in the line of duty, which if the children are under eighteen (18)
years of age or under twenty-two (22) twenty-three (23) years of age while
enrolled in an institution of higher education, as provided in § 24-6-217.
(b) Upon the reaching of eighteen (18) years of age by the unmarried
children or the failure to enroll in an institution of higher education if
the child is under twenty-two (22) twenty-three (23) years of age, the
surviving spouse shall continue to receive benefits as provided by law, but
upon his or her remarriage or death, the benefits shall terminate.
(c) It is the specific intent of this section that surviving spouses
as described in this section be eligible for survivors' benefits for
themselves and any unmarried children under eighteen (18) years of age of the
deceased uniformed employee of the division state police officer who was
killed in the line of duty, or any children under twenty-two (22) twenty-
three (23) years of age while enrolled in an institution of higher education,
irrespective of whether the employee was a member of, or was eligible for
benefits under, the State Police Retirement System at the time of his or her
death.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-6-226(c), concerning voluntary
retirement for Tier 1 noncontributory members under the State Police
Retirement System, is amended to read as follows:
(c) Upon the member's retirement, he or she shall receive a pension
provided for in § 24-6-216 § 24-6-227.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-6-409(c)—(d), concerning the calculation
of a benefit payable as a redetermined amount under the Tier Two Benefit Plan
of the State Police Retirement System, is repealed.
(c) In no event shall the redetermined amount be more than the
amount of the benefit payable as of the immediately preceding July 1
multiplied by the following fraction:
(1) The numerator shall be the average of the consumer price
01/23/2025 9:53:22 AM LJH050

HB1207
index for the twelve (12) calendar months in the calendar year immediately
preceding July 1, but in no event an amount less than the denominator; and
(2) The denominator shall be the average of the consumer price
index for the twelve (12) calendar months in the second calendar year
preceding the redetermination date.
(d)(1) As used in this section, “consumer price index” means the
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as determined by the United
States Department of Labor and in effect January 1, 1987.
(2) However, should the consumer price index be restructured
subsequent to 1988 in a manner materially changing its character, the Board
of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System, after receiving the advice
of the actuary, shall change the application of the consumer price index so
that, as far as is practicable, the 1986 intent of the use of the consumer
price index shall be continued.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 24-6-413(b), concerning when Tier Two
Benefit Plan benefits may be levied by a court and the protection of benefits
from certain creditors under the State Police Retirement System, is amended
to read as follows:
(b) An exception to the prohibition against subjection of annuity
rights to any process of law is allowed for the following:
(1) An employer shall have the right of setoff for any claim
arising from embezzlement by or fraud of a member, retirant, or beneficiary;
and
(2) A court of competent jurisdiction of this state may order
the monthly benefit of a retirant to be paid into the registry of the court
for disposition as the court deems just and proper if the retirant is found
by the court to be willfully refusing or failing to support his or her minor
dependent children in violation of a court order providing for that support.







01/23/2025 9:53:22 AM LJH050